Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.491

Member—Payment demand—Entitlement.

(1) A member of a limited liability company who demands payment retains all other rights of a member of such limited liability company until the proposed merger becomes effective.

(2) A member of a limited liability company sent a dissenters' notice who does not demand payment by the date set in the dissenters' notice is not entitled to payment for the member's interest in the limited liability company under this article.

[ 2015 c 188 s 94.]